Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB874.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 507. Residence of Incarcerated Individuals.--(a) The following shall apply to the use of persons counted in a Federal decennial census for the purpose of creating legislative redistricting plans for the General Assembly as required under section 17 of Article II of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, congressional redistricting plans and redistricting plans for 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 political subdivisions:(1) The population count shall include the following individuals as residing at the individual's last known address if the individual was a resident of this Commonwealth:(i) an individual incarcerated in a Federal or State correctional facility at the time of the decennial census; and(ii) a juvenile being held in a juvenile placement facility at the time of the decennial census.(2) An inmate or person in State custody in this Commonwealth whose last known place of residence is outside of this Commonwealth or whose last known place of residence cannot be determined shall be considered a resident at the location of the facility in which the inmate or resident is incarcerated, placed or committed.(b) The Department of Corrections and the Department of Human Services shall furnish the following information to the Legislative Data Processing Center, the Legislative Reapportionment Commission and other bodies used to reapportion districts for political subdivision elections:(1) A unique identifier, not including the name, of each individual incarcerated or held in a State correctional facility or juvenile placement facility in this Commonwealth at the time of the Federal decennial census.(2) The census block of the correctional facility in which a person under paragraph (1) was incarcerated or held.(3) The residential address of a person described under paragraph (1) prior to the individual's incarceration, or sufficient information to determine the census block of the individual's last known place of residence.(4) The race, ethnicity and age of each person described 20250SB0874PN0979 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under paragraph (1).(c) The Department of Corrections and the Department of Human Services shall begin collecting the data under subsection (b) no later than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection and provide the information to the Legislative Data Processing Center, the Legislative Reapportionment Commission and other bodies used to reapportion districts for political subdivision elections no later than June 1 of each year ending in one.(d) The following words and phrases when used in this subdivision shall have the following meanings unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:"Last known place of residence" shall mean the address at which an inmate or resident was last domiciled prior to the inmate or resident's placement or current term of incarceration, as reported by the inmate or resident.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0874PN0979 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617